en: Audio/Video cable connector type (end A): 3.5 mm TRS; 6.35 mm (1/4 in) TS; DisplayPort; HDMI Type A; HDMI Type C (Mini); HDMI Type D (Micro); Mini DisplayPort; RCA; VGA (HD15); XLR 3-pin; Other
fr: Type de connecteur de câble audio/vidéo (extrémité A): TRS 3,5 mm; TS 6,35 mm (1/4 po); DisplayPort; HDMI Type A; HDMI Type C (Mini); HDMI Type D (Micro); Mini DisplayPort; RCA; VGA (HD15); XLR 3 broches; Autre
zh-TW: 音訊/視訊纜線連接器類型 (端 A): 3.5mm TRS; 6.35mm (1/4英吋) TS; DisplayPort; HDMI Type A; HDMI Type C (Mini); HDMI Type D (Micro); Mini DisplayPort; RCA; VGA (HD15); XLR 3針; 其他
fi: Audio/video-kaapelin liitintyyppi (pää A): 3,5 mm TRS; 6,35 mm (1/4 tuuman) TS; DisplayPort; HDMI-tyyppi A; HDMI-tyyppi C (Mini); HDMI-tyyppi D (Micro); Mini DisplayPort; RCA; VGA (HD15); XLR 3-nastainen; Muu
hu: Audio-/videókábel csatlakozótípusa (A-vég): 3,5 mm TRS; 6,35 mm (1/4 hüvelyk) TS; DisplayPort; HDMI A típus; HDMI C típus (Mini); HDMI D típus (Micro); Mini DisplayPort; RCA; VGA (HD15); XLR 3 tűs; Egyéb
sl-SI: Tip priključka avdio/video kabla (konec A): 3,5 mm TRS; 6,35 mm (1/4 in) TS; DisplayPort; HDMI tip A; HDMI tip C (Mini); HDMI tip D (Micro); Mini DisplayPort; RCA; VGA (HD15); XLR 3-pinski; Drugo
hr-HR: Tip konektora audio/video kabela (kraj A): 3,5 mm TRS; 6,35 mm (1/4 in) TS; DisplayPort; HDMI tip A; HDMI tip C (mini); HDMI tip D (mikro); Mini DisplayPort; RCA; VGA (HD15); XLR 3-pinski; Ostalo
bg-BG: Тип конектор на аудио- или видеокабел (край А): 3,5 мм TRS; 6,35 мм (1/4 инча) TS; DisplayPort; HDMI тип A; HDMI тип C (мини); HDMI тип D (микро); Мини DisplayPort; RCA; VGA (HD15); XLR 3-пинов; Други
de: Audio-/Video-Kabelsteckertyp (Ende A): 3,5 mm TRS; 6,35 mm (1/4 Zoll) TS; DisplayPort; HDMI Typ A; HDMI Typ C (Mini); HDMI Typ D (Micro); Mini DisplayPort; RCA; VGA (HD15); XLR 3-polig; Sonstiges
cs: Typ konektoru audio/video kabelu (konec A): 3,5 mm TRS; 6,35 mm (1/4 palce) TS; DisplayPort; HDMI typ A; HDMI typ C (mini); HDMI typ D (micro); Mini DisplayPort; RCA; VGA (HD15); XLR 3pinový; Jiné
ko: 오디오/비디오 케이블 커넥터 유형 (끝 A): 3.5mm TRS; 6.35mm (1/4인치) TS; 디스플레이포트; HDMI 타입 A; HDMI 타입 C (미니); HDMI 타입 D (마이크로); 미니 디스플레이포트; RCA; VGA (HD15); XLR 3핀; 기타
es: Tipo de conector del cable de audio/video (extremo A): TRS de 3,5 mm; TS de 6,35 mm (1/4 pulgada); DisplayPort; HDMI tipo A; HDMI tipo C (Mini); HDMI tipo D (Micro); Mini DisplayPort; RCA; VGA (HD15); XLR de 3 pines; Otros
pt-BR: Tipo de conector de cabo áudio/vídeo (extremidade A): TRS 3,5 mm; TS 6,35 mm (1/4 pol); DisplayPort; HDMI Tipo A; HDMI Tipo C (Mini); HDMI Tipo D (Micro); Mini DisplayPort; RCA; VGA (HD15); XLR 3 pinos; Outro
sv: Audio/Video-kabelkontakttyp (ände A): 3,5 mm TRS; 6,35 mm (1/4 tum) TS; DisplayPort; HDMI Typ A; HDMI Typ C (Mini); HDMI Typ D (Micro); Mini DisplayPort; RCA; VGA (HD15); XLR 3-polig; Övrigt
th: ประเภทขั้วต่อสายเคเบิลเสียง/วิดีโอ (ปลาย A): 3.5 มม. TRS; 6.35 มม. (1/4 นิ้ว) TS; DisplayPort; HDMI Type A; HDMI Type C (Mini); HDMI Type D (Micro); Mini DisplayPort; RCA; VGA (HD15); XLR 3 ขา; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 音频/视频电缆连接器类型（端 A）: 3.5 毫米 TRS; 6.35 毫米（1/4 英寸）TS; DisplayPort; HDMI A 型; HDMI C 型（迷你）; HDMI D 型（微型）; 迷你 DisplayPort; RCA; VGA (HD15); XLR 3 针; 其他
el: Τύπος συνδετήρα καλωδίου ήχου/βίντεο (άκρο A): 3,5 mm TRS; 6,35 mm (1/4 in) TS; DisplayPort; HDMI τύπου A; HDMI τύπου C (Mini); HDMI τύπου D (Micro); Mini DisplayPort; RCA; VGA (HD15); XLR 3-pin; Άλλο
lt-LT: Garso/vaizdo kabelio jungties tipas (A galas): 3,5 mm TRS; 6,35 mm (1/4 colio) TS; DisplayPort; HDMI A tipo; HDMI C tipo (Mini); HDMI D tipo (Micro); Mini DisplayPort; RCA; VGA (HD15); XLR 3 kontaktų; Kita
ru: Тип разъема аудиовидеокабеля (разъем А): 3,5 мм TRS; 6,35 мм (1/4 дюйма) TS; DisplayPort; HDMI тип A; HDMI тип C (мини); HDMI тип D (микро); Mini DisplayPort; RCA; VGA (HD15); XLR 3-контактный; Другой
nb: Lyd/video-kabelkontakttype (ende A): 3,5 mm TRS; 6,35 mm (1/4 tommer) TS; DisplayPort; HDMI type A; HDMI type C (mini); HDMI type D (mikro); Mini DisplayPort; RCA; VGA (HD15); XLR 3-pinners; Annet
it: Tipo di connettore del cavo audio/video (estremità A): TRS da 3,5 mm; TS da 6,35 mm (1/4 pollici); DisplayPort; HDMI tipo A; HDMI tipo C (mini); HDMI tipo D (micro); Mini DisplayPort; RCA; VGA (HD15); XLR a 3 pin; Altro
tr: Ses/Video kablo konnektör tipi (uç A): 3,5 mm TRS; 6,35 mm (1/4 inç) TS; DisplayPort; HDMI Tip A; HDMI Tip C (Mini); HDMI Tip D (Mikro); Mini DisplayPort; RCA; VGA (HD15); XLR 3 pin; Diğer
nl: Type audio/video-kabelconnector (uiteinde A): 3,5 mm TRS; 6,35 mm (1/4 inch) TS; DisplayPort; HDMI Type A; HDMI Type C (Mini); HDMI Type D (Micro); Mini DisplayPort; RCA; VGA (HD15); XLR 3-pins; Andere
sk-SK: Typ konektora audio/video kábla (koniec A): 3,5 mm TRS; 6,35 mm (1/4 palca) TS; DisplayPort; HDMI typ A; HDMI typ C (Mini); HDMI typ D (Micro); Mini DisplayPort; RCA; VGA (HD15); XLR 3-pin; Iné
vi: Loại đầu nối cáp âm thanh/video (đầu A): 3,5 mm TRS; 6,35 mm (1/4 in) TS; DisplayPort; HDMI loại A; HDMI loại C (Mini); HDMI loại D (Micro); Mini DisplayPort; RCA; VGA (HD15); XLR 3 chân; Khác
pl: Typ złącza audio/wideo (koniec A): 3,5 mm TRS; 6,35 mm (1/4 cala) TS; DisplayPort; HDMI typ A; HDMI typ C (mini); HDMI typ D (micro); Mini DisplayPort; RCA; VGA (HD15); XLR 3-pinowy; Inne
ja: オーディオ／ビデオケーブルコネクタータイプ（端A）: 3.5 mm TRS; 6.35 mm (1/4 インチ) TS; DisplayPort; HDMI Type A; HDMI Type C (Mini); HDMI Type D (Micro); Mini DisplayPort; RCA; VGA (HD15); XLR 3ピン; その他
ro-RO: Tip conector cablu audio/video (capăt A): 3,5 mm TRS; 6,35 mm (1/4 in) TS; DisplayPort; HDMI tip A; HDMI tip C (Mini); HDMI tip D (Micro); Mini DisplayPort; RCA; VGA (HD15); XLR 3 pini; Altele
pt-PT: Tipo de conector de cabo áudio/vídeo (extremidade A): TRS de 3,5 mm; TS de 6,35 mm (1/4 pol); DisplayPort; HDMI Tipo A; HDMI Tipo C (Mini); HDMI Tipo D (Micro); Mini DisplayPort; RCA; VGA (HD15); XLR de 3 pinos; Outro
da: Lyd-/videokabelstiktype (ende A): 3,5 mm TRS; 6,35 mm (1/4 tomme) TS; DisplayPort; HDMI Type A; HDMI Type C (Mini); HDMI Type D (Micro); Mini DisplayPort; RCA; VGA (HD15); XLR 3-polet; Andet